Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1572.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:

STUDENT DISCIPLINE

SECTION 1. ORS 339.250 is amended to read:
339.250. (1) Public school students shall comply with rules for the government of such schools,
pursue the prescribed course of study, use the prescribed textbooks and submit to the teachers’ au-
thority.
(2) Each district school board shall adopt written policies for the discipline, suspension or ex-
pulsion of any refractory student. The policies:
(a) May allow discipline, suspension or expulsion for conduct that includes, but is not limited
to:
(A) Willful disobedience;
(B) Open defiance of the authority of a school employee;
(C) Disruptive behavior;
[(C)] (D) Possession or distribution of tobacco, alcohol, drugs or other controlled substances;
[(D)] (E) Use or display of profane or obscene language;
[(E)] (F) Willful damage or injury to school property;
[(F)] (G) Use of threats, intimidation, harassment or coercion against a student or a school
employee;
[(G)] (H) Assault of a school employee or another student; or
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 199

SB 1572
[(H)] (I) Intentional attempts, by word or conduct, to place a school employee or another student
in fear of imminent serious physical injury.
(b) Must establish procedures to address behavior or circumstances that pose a threat
to the safety of students or employees of the school, including:
(A) The methods for reporting a threat;
(B) The authorization for teachers and administrators to immediately remove from the
classroom setting a student who threatened to injure another person or to severely damage
school property; and
(C) The authorization for an administrator to place the student in a setting where the
behavior will receive immediate attention, including the office of a school administrator,
school counselor or school psychologist or the office of any licensed mental health profes-
sional.
(c) Must allow teachers and administrators to immediately remove from the classroom
setting a student who repeatedly interferes with the teacher’s ability to communicate effec-
tively with the students in the class or with the ability of the students to learn.
(d) Must provide for the establishment of a placement review committee for each school
of the school district that:
(A) Provides for the placement of a student when:
(i) The student has been removed from the classroom; and
(ii) The teacher for the classroom has not provided written consent for the return of the
student to the classroom; and
(B) Includes one administrator, one teacher and one parent.
[(b)] (e) Must require consideration of the age of a student and the past pattern of behavior of
a student prior to imposing the suspension or expulsion of a student.
[(c)] (f) Must limit the use of expulsion to the following circumstances:
(A) For conduct that poses a threat to the health or safety of students or school employees;
(B) When other strategies to change student conduct have been ineffective, except that expul-
sion may not be used to address truancy; or
(C) When the expulsion is required by law.
[(d)] (g) In addition to any limitations imposed by paragraph [(c)] (f) of this subsection, for a
student who is in fifth grade or lower, must limit the use of out-of-school suspension or of expulsion
to the following circumstances:
(A) For nonaccidental conduct causing serious physical harm to a student or school employee;
(B) When a school administrator determines, based upon the administrator’s observation or upon
a report from a school employee, that the student’s conduct poses a direct threat to the health or
safety of students or school employees; or
(C) When the suspension or expulsion is required by law.
[(e)] (h) When an out-of-school suspension is imposed as provided under paragraph [(d)] (g) of
this subsection, must require the school district to take steps to prevent the recurrence of the be-
havior that led to the out-of-school suspension and return the student to a classroom setting so that
the disruption of the student’s academic instruction is minimized.
[(f)] (i) Must be limited so that:
(A) The duration of an expulsion may not be more than one calendar year.
(B) The duration of a suspension may not be more than 10 school days.
[(g)] (j) Notwithstanding ORS 336.010, may require a student to attend school during nonschool
[2]

SB 1572
hours as an alternative to suspension if the total number of hours does not exceed the equivalent
of 10 school days.
(3) Pursuant to the policies adopted as provided by subsection (2) of this section, each school
district shall develop a student handbook, code of conduct or other document that:
(a) Defines and helps create a learning environment that students respect;
(b) Defines acceptable norms of behavior for students and the types of behavior that are subject
to discipline;
[(c) Establishes procedures to address behavior or circumstances that pose a threat to the safety
of students or employees of the school;]
(c) Describes the procedures described in subsection (2)(b) of this section;
(d) Establishes a system of consequences that are designed to correct student misconduct and
promote behavior within acceptable norms; and
(e) Makes the system of consequences established under paragraph (d) of this subsection
known to the school community through the dissemination of information to students, parents, legal
guardians and school district employees.
[(4) Each district school board shall adopt written policies on managing students who threaten vi-
olence or harm in public schools. The policies adopted by a district school board under this section
shall include all of the following:]
[(a) Staff reporting methods.]
[(b) Provisions that allow an administrator to consider and implement any of the following
options:]
[(A) Immediately removing from the classroom setting any student who has threatened to injure
another person or to severely damage school property.]
[(B) Placing the student in a setting where the behavior will receive immediate attention, including,
but not limited to, the office of the school principal, vice principal, assistant principal, counselor or a
school psychologist licensed by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission or the office of any
licensed mental health professional.]
(4) Each district school board shall adopt written policies for managing students who
have been removed from the classroom setting. The policies adopted by a district school
board under this subsection shall include all of the following:
(a) The requirement that an administrator provide to the parent or legal guardian of the
student notification that describes the student’s behavior and the school’s response.
(b) The prohibition against returning a student to a classroom setting until:
(A) The teacher of the classroom provides written consent for the return; or
(B) A written plan is developed as provided by paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(c) If a teacher does not provide written consent for the return of a student to the
classroom, the requirement that the school convene the placement review committee de-
scribed in subsection (2)(d) of this section within three school days of the removal. The
committee must:
(A) Allow the student to provide a response regarding the circumstances of the removal;
(B) Allow the teacher of the classroom to provide input regarding the circumstances of
the removal;
(C) Consider any mitigating factors, including any behavior intervention plans and any
evaluations conducted as provided by paragraph (d) of this subsection; and
(D) Develop a plan for returning a student to the classroom setting.
[3]

SB 1572
[(C)] (d) [Requiring] An allowance for an administrator to consider and implement a re-
quirement that a school obtain an evaluation of a student by a licensed mental health professional
before allowing the student to return to the classroom setting if the student had been removed
for threatening to injure another person or to severely damage school property. A student
who is removed from the classroom setting for an evaluation may not be removed for more than 10
school days unless the administrator is able to show good cause that an evaluation could not be
completed in that time period. The policy must describe the circumstances under which the district
school board may enter into contracts with licensed mental health professionals to perform any
evaluations required under this subparagraph.
[(c) The requirement that an administrator provide to the parent or legal guardian of the student
notification that describes the student’s behavior and the school’s response.]
[(d)] (e) A provision for the allocation of any funds necessary for the school district to imple-
ment the policies described in this subsection.
(5) In establishing and enforcing discipline, suspension and expulsion policies, a district school
board shall ensure that the policy is designed to:
(a) Protect students and school employees from harm;
(b) Provide opportunities for students to learn from their mistakes;
(c) Foster positive learning communities;
(d) Keep students in school and attending class;
(e) Impose disciplinary sanctions without bias against students from a protected class, as defined
in ORS 339.351;
(f) Implement a graduated set of age-appropriate responses to misconduct that are fair,
nondiscriminatory and proportionate in relation to each student’s individual conduct;
(g) Employ a range of strategies for prevention, intervention and discipline that take into ac-
count a student’s developmental capacities and that are proportionate to the degree and severity
of the student’s misbehavior;
(h) Propose, prior to a student’s expulsion or leaving school, alternative programs of instruction
or instruction combined with counseling for the student that are appropriate and accessible to the
student in the following circumstances:
(A) Following a second or subsequent occurrence within any three-year period of a severe dis-
ciplinary problem with the student; or
(B) When a parent or legal guardian applies for the student’s exemption from compulsory at-
tendance on a semiannual basis as provided in ORS 339.030 (2);
(i) To the extent practicable, use approaches that are shown through research to be effective in
reducing student misbehavior and promoting safe and productive social behavior; and
(j) Ensure that school conduct and discipline codes comply with all state and federal laws con-
cerning the education of students with disabilities.
(6) Except for policies adopted under subsection (7) of this section, any policies adopted under
this section must provide for the dissemination of information about alternative programs of in-
struction or instruction combined with counseling, as described in subsection (5)(h) of this section,
in writing to the student and the parent, legal guardian or person in parental relationship with the
student at least once every six months, unless the information has changed because of the avail-
ability of new programs.
(7) Each district school board shall adopt a written policy involving firearms, as defined in 18
U.S.C. 921. The policy shall:
[4]

SB 1572
(a) Require expulsion from school for a period of not less than one year of any student who is
determined to have:
(A) Brought a firearm to a school, to school property under the jurisdiction of the school district
or to an activity under the jurisdiction of the school district;
(B) Possessed, concealed or used a firearm in a school, on school property under the jurisdiction
of the school district or at an activity under the jurisdiction of the school district; or
(C) Brought to or possessed, concealed or used a firearm at an interscholastic activity adminis-
tered by a voluntary organization.
(b) Allow exceptions:
(A) For courses, programs and activities approved by the school district that are conducted on
school property, including, but not limited to, hunter safety courses, Reserve Officer Training Corps
programs, firearm-related sports or firearm-related vocational courses; and
(B) Identified by and adopted by the State Board of Education by rule.
(c) Allow a superintendent of a school district to:
(A) Modify the expulsion requirement for a student on a case-by-case basis.
(B) Propose alternative programs of instruction or instruction combined with counseling for a
student that are appropriate and accessible to the student. If alternative programs are appropriate
for a student, the superintendent shall ensure that information about programs of instruction or in-
struction combined with counseling is provided in writing to the student and the parent, legal
guardian or person in parental relationship with the student at least once every six months, or at
any time the information changes because of the availability of new programs.
(d) Require a referral to the appropriate law enforcement agency of any student who is expelled
under this subsection.
(e) Require an annual reporting to the Department of Education of the name of each school that
had an expulsion under this subsection and the number of students expelled from each school.
(8) Each district school board shall adopt and disseminate written policies for the use of physical
force upon a student. The policies must allow an individual who is a teacher, administrator, school
employee or school volunteer to use reasonable physical force upon a student when and to the ex-
tent the application of force is consistent with ORS 339.285 to 339.303.
(9)(a) A school administrator, teacher or other school employee is not liable in a criminal
action or for civil damages for the imposition of discipline that is imposed in a manner con-
sistent with state and federal law, the requirements of this section and policies and proce-
dures adopted by the district school board.
[(9)(a)] (b) The authority to discipline a student does not authorize the infliction of corporal
punishment. Every resolution, bylaw, rule, ordinance or other act of a district school board, a public
charter school or the Department of Education that permits or authorizes the infliction of corporal
punishment upon a student is void and unenforceable.
[(b)] (c) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Corporal punishment” means the willful infliction of, or willfully causing the infliction of,
physical pain on a student.
(B) “Corporal punishment” does not include:
(i) The use of physical force authorized by ORS 161.205 (2), (4) or (5) for the reasons specified
therein; or
(ii) Physical pain or discomfort resulting from or caused by participation in athletic competition
or other such recreational activity, voluntarily engaged in by a student.
[5]

SB 1572
(10) For purposes of this section, calculations of the number of school days that a student is
removed from a classroom setting shall be as follows:
(a) As a half day if the student is out of school for half, or less than half, of the scheduled school
day; and
(b) As a full day if the student is out of school for more than half of the scheduled school day.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 339.250 by section 1 of this 2026 Act first apply to
the 2026-2027 school year.

ESSENTIAL LEARNING SKILLS REQUIRED FOR GRADUATION

SECTION 3. ORS 329.007 is amended to read:
329.007. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Academic content standards” means expectations of student knowledge and skills adopted
by the State Board of Education under ORS 329.045.
(2) “Administrator” includes all persons whose duties require an administrative license.
[(3) “Board” or “state board” means the State Board of Education.]
[(4)] (3) “Community learning center” means a school-based or school-linked program providing
informal meeting places and coordination for community activities, adult education, child care, in-
formation and referral and other services as described in ORS 329.157. “Community learning
center” includes, but is not limited to, a community school program as defined in ORS 336.505,
family resource centers as described in ORS 417.725, full service schools, lighted schools and 21st
century community learning centers.
[(5) “Department” means the Department of Education.]
(4) “Essential Learning Skills” means process skills, as identified by the State Board of
Education by rule, that:
(a) Cross academic disciplines;
(b) Can be applied in a variety of courses, subjects and settings; and
(c) Are embedded in academic content standards.
[(6)] (5) “Higher education and career path skills” means instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Applying for jobs, including preparing a resume or filling out a job application and develop-
ing job interview skills;
(b) Applying for admission to a post-secondary institution of education, including applying for
financial aid and scholarships;
(c) Applying for post-secondary learning and job training opportunities and programs that do not
require a four-year degree, including apprenticeships and how to meet the prerequisites for those
opportunities and programs;
(d) Developing career-related skills, including improving employability skills, taking advantage
of community-based experiential learning and gaining knowledge of career opportunities; and
(e) Seeking assistance, including accessing community resources and acting as a self-advocate
for mental, physical and financial well-being.
[(7)] (6) “History, geography, economics and civics” includes, but is not limited to, Oregon
Studies.
[(8)] (7) “Language arts” includes reading, writing and other communications in any language,
including English.
[(9)] (8) “Oregon Studies” means history, geography, economics and civics specific to the State
[6]

SB 1572
of Oregon. Oregon Studies instruction in Oregon government shall include municipal, county, tribal
and state government, as well as the electoral and legislative processes.
[(10)] (9) “Parents” means parents or guardians of students who are covered by this chapter.
[(11)] (10) “Personal financial education” means instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Credit scores, including how to build credit, the costs and benefits of borrowing money on
credit and the long-term impacts of high or low credit scores;
(b) Investments, asset building and debt, including how to open a bank account, different types
of bank accounts, compound interest, the total cost of loan repayment, comparing investment options
and types of investments and understanding different types of retirement accounts;
(c) Strategies for creating a budget, tracking and modifying spending patterns and understanding
insurance products, including exploring common costs associated with rentals and home ownership;
(d) Taxes, including accessing tax credits, understanding tax cycles, being familiar with state
and federal tax forms and being familiar with federal, state, regional and local taxes; and
(e) Building financial well-being, including evaluating the impact of behavioral economics and
the psychology of money, explaining trends in financial health and evaluating consumer skills, in-
cluding fraud and identity theft prevention.
[(12)] (11) “Public charter school” has the meaning given that term in ORS 338.005.
[(13)] (12) “School district” means a school district as defined in ORS 332.002, a state-operated
school or any legally constituted combination of such entities.
[(14)] (13) “Teacher” means any licensed employee of a school district who has direct responsi-
bility for instruction, coordination of educational programs or supervision of students and who is
compensated for such services from public funds. “Teacher” does not include a school nurse, as
defined in ORS 342.455, or a person whose duties require an administrative license.
[(15)] (14) “The arts” includes, but is not limited to, literary arts, performing arts and visual
arts.
[(16)] (15) “World languages” includes sign language, heritage languages and languages other
than a student’s primary language.
[(17)] (16) “21st Century Schools Council” means a council established pursuant to ORS 329.704.
SECTION 4. ORS 329.007, as amended by section 6, chapter 253, Oregon Laws 2019, section 3,
chapter 178, Oregon Laws 2021, and section 4, chapter 564, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
329.007. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Academic content standards” means expectations of student knowledge and skills adopted
by the State Board of Education under ORS 329.045.
(2) “Administrator” includes all persons whose duties require an administrative license.
[(3) “Board” or “state board” means the State Board of Education.]
[(4)] (3) “Community learning center” means a school-based or school-linked program providing
informal meeting places and coordination for community activities, adult education, child care, in-
formation and referral and other services as described in ORS 329.157. “Community learning
center” includes, but is not limited to, a community school program as defined in ORS 336.505,
family resource centers as described in ORS 417.725, full service schools, lighted schools and 21st
century community learning centers.
[(5) “Department” means the Department of Education.]
(4) “Essential Learning Skills” means process skills, as identified by the State Board of
Education by rule, that:
(a) Cross academic disciplines;
[7]

SB 1572
(b) Can be applied in a variety of courses, subjects and settings; and
(c) Are embedded in academic content standards.
[(6)] (5) “Higher education and career path skills” means instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Applying for jobs, including preparing a resume or filling out a job application and develop-
ing job interview skills;
(b) Applying for admission to a post-secondary institution of education, including applying for
financial aid and scholarships;
(c) Applying for post-secondary learning and job training opportunities and programs that do not
require a four-year degree, including apprenticeships and how to meet the prerequisites for those
opportunities and programs;
(d) Developing career-related skills, including improving employability skills, taking advantage
of community-based experiential learning and gaining knowledge of career opportunities; and
(e) Seeking assistance, including accessing community resources and acting as a self-advocate
for mental, physical and financial well-being.
[(7)] (6) “History, geography, economics and civics” includes, but is not limited to, Holocaust
and genocide studies and Oregon Studies.
[(8)] (7) “Holocaust and genocide studies” means studies on the Holocaust, genocide and other
acts of mass violence that comply with the requirements described in ORS 329.494.
[(9)] (8) “Language arts” includes reading, writing and other communications in any language,
including English.
[(10)] (9) “Oregon Studies” means history, geography, economics and civics specific to the State
of Oregon. Oregon Studies instruction in Oregon government shall include municipal, county, tribal
and state government, as well as the electoral and legislative processes.
[(11)] (10) “Parents” means parents or guardians of students who are covered by this chapter.
[(12)] (11) “Personal financial education” means instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Credit scores, including how to build credit, the costs and benefits of borrowing money on
credit and the long-term impacts of high or low credit scores;
(b) Investments, asset building and debt, including how to open a bank account, different types
of bank accounts, compound interest, the total cost of loan repayment, comparing investment options
and types of investments and understanding different types of retirement accounts;
(c) Strategies for creating a budget, tracking and modifying spending patterns and understanding
insurance products, including exploring common costs associated with rentals and home ownership;
(d) Taxes, including accessing tax credits, understanding tax cycles, being familiar with state
and federal tax forms and being familiar with federal, state, regional and local taxes; and
(e) Building financial well-being, including evaluating the impact of behavioral economics and
the psychology of money, explaining trends in financial health and evaluating consumer skills, in-
cluding fraud and identity theft prevention.
[(13)] (12) “Public charter school” has the meaning given that term in ORS 338.005.
[(14)] (13) “School district” means a school district as defined in ORS 332.002, a state-operated
school or any legally constituted combination of such entities.
[(15)] (14) “Teacher” means any licensed employee of a school district who has direct responsi-
bility for instruction, coordination of educational programs or supervision of students and who is
compensated for such services from public funds. “Teacher” does not include a school nurse, as
defined in ORS 342.455, or a person whose duties require an administrative license.
[(16)] (15) “The arts” includes, but is not limited to, literary arts, performing arts and visual
[8]

SB 1572
arts.
[(17)] (16) “World languages” includes sign language, heritage languages and languages other
than a student’s primary language.
[(18)] (17) “21st Century Schools Council” means a council established pursuant to ORS 329.704.
SECTION 5. ORS 329.451 is amended to read:
329.451. (1)(a) At or before grade 12, a school district or public charter school shall award a high
school diploma to a student who completes the requirements established by [subsection (2)] sub-
sections (2) and (3) of this section.
(b) A school district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma to a student who
satisfies the requirements established by [subsection (7)] subsections (3) and (7) of this section, an
extended diploma to a student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (8) of this
section or a certificate of attendance to a student who satisfies the requirements established by
subsection (9) of this section.
(c) A school district or public charter school may not deny a student who has the documented
history described in subsection (7)(b) or (8)(b) of this section the opportunity to pursue a diploma
with more stringent requirements than a modified diploma or an extended diploma.
(d) A school district or public charter school may award a modified diploma or extended diploma
to a student only upon receiving consent as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(2)(a) In order to receive a high school diploma from a school district or public charter school,
a student must satisfy the requirements established by the State Board of Education and the school
district or public charter school and, while in grades 9 through 12, must complete at least 24 total
credits, which must include at least:
(A) Three credits of mathematics;
(B) Four credits of language arts; and
(C) One half-credit of civics.
(b) If a school district or public charter school requires a student to complete more than 24 total
credits, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school district or public charter school
may only require the student to complete additional credits for:
(A) Subjects for which the State Board of Education has established academic content standards
under ORS 329.045;
(B) Courses provided as part of a career and technical education program; or
(C) Courses that provide, or qualify to provide, credit at post-secondary institutions of education.
(c)(A) A school district or public charter school that requires students to satisfy any require-
ments not specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of Education
must grant to a student a waiver of the requirements established by the school district or public
charter school if the student is or, at any time from grade 9 to 12, was:
(i) A foster child, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(ii) Homeless, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iii) A runaway, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iv) A child in a military family covered by the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity
for Military Children, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(v) A child of a migrant worker, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Edu-
cation;
[9]

SB 1572
(vi) Enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education
Program; or
(vii) Enrolled in an approved recovery school under ORS 336.680.
(B)(i) For any student identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a school district or
public charter school must accept any credits earned by the student in an educational program in
this state and apply those credits toward requirements specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection
or by rule of the State Board of Education if the credits satisfied those requirements in that edu-
cational program in this state.
(ii) As used in this subparagraph, “educational program in this state” means an educational
program that is:
(I) Provided by a school district, a public charter school, an approved recovery school, the
Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(II) Funded as provided by ORS 343.243 for students in a long term care or treatment facility
described in ORS 343.961 or a hospital identified in ORS 343.261.
(d)(A) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules by which a student who has completed
an International Baccalaureate program may satisfy the credit requirements prescribed by para-
graph (a) of this subsection and any or all of the requirements established by rule of the State Board
of Education under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The rules:
(i) Must provide that the student has satisfied those requirements if the student has satisfied:
(I) All of the requirements for an International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme or an Inter-
national Baccalaureate Career-related Programme; and
(II) Any other requirements prescribed by the board by rule for a student who has completed
an International Baccalaureate program.
(ii) May provide that, only for the purpose of satisfying requirements as provided by this para-
graph, a person who is not an external International Baccalaureate examiner may grade assessments
or examinations for either program.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph prohibits a school district or public charter school from estab-
lishing requirements that are in addition to the credit requirements prescribed by paragraph (a) of
this subsection or any requirements established by rule under paragraph (a) of this subsection or
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) When establishing requirements under this paragraph, the board or a school district or
public charter school shall attempt not to establish requirements that may discourage access to or
participation in the International Baccalaureate program.
(3)(a) In addition to the credit requirements described in subsection (2) of this section
and any other requirements established by the State Board of Education or by a school dis-
trict or public charter school, the board shall adopt proficiency standards for Essential
Learning Skills that must be demonstrated before a student is awarded a high school diploma
or a modified diploma. The proficiency standards must be demonstrated for, at a minimum,
the following:
(A) Reading and comprehending a variety of text;
(B) Writing clearly and accurately; and
(C) Applying mathematics in a variety of settings.
(b) The board shall adopt by rule assessment options for students to demonstrate profi-
ciency in Essential Learning Skills, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[(3)] (c) A student providing work samples to demonstrate proficiency in Essential Learning
[10]

SB 1572
Skills [as may be required under subsection (2) of this section] must be allowed to use accommodations
described in the student’s individualized education program or the student’s plan developed in ac-
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794. As used in this
[subsection] paragraph, the term “accommodations”:
[(a)] (A) Includes, but is not limited to:
[(A)] (i) Additional time to demonstrate proficiency.
[(B)] (ii) The ability to demonstrate proficiency in an alternative location that is secure and
proctored.
[(C)] (iii) The use of text-to-speech or speech-to-text technology or other assistive technology.
[(b)] (B) Does not include modifications that lower the proficiency standards or that are used
solely to earn modified credit.
(4) A student may satisfy the requirements of [subsection (2)] subsections (2) and (3) of this
section in less than four years. If a student satisfies the requirements of [subsection (2)] subsections
(2) and (3) of this section and a school district or public charter school has received consent as
provided by subsection (6) of this section, the school district or public charter school shall award
a high school diploma to the student.
(5) If a school district or public charter school has received consent as provided by subsection
(6) of this section, the school district or public charter school may advance the student to the next
grade level if the student has satisfied the requirements for the student’s current grade level.
(6)(a) For the purpose of receiving consent as provided by subsections (1)(d), (4) and (5) of this
section, consent shall be provided by:
(A) The parent or guardian of the student, if the student:
(i) Is under 18 years of age and is not emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558; or
(ii) Has been determined not to have the ability to give informed consent regarding the student’s
education pursuant to a protective proceeding under ORS chapter 125; or
(B) The student, if the student is 18 years of age or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(b) For the purpose of awarding a modified diploma or extended diploma as provided by sub-
section (1)(d) of this section or of awarding a high school diploma as provided by subsection (4) of
this section, consent must be received during the school year for which the diploma will be awarded.
(7) A school district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma only to students
who have demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for a modified di-
ploma, a student must:
(a) Satisfy the requirements for a modified diploma established by this section and the State
Board of Education; and
(b) Have a documented history of an inability to maintain grade level achievement due to sig-
nificant learning and instructional barriers or have a documented history of a medical condition that
creates a barrier to achievement.
(8) A school district or public charter school shall award an extended diploma only to students
who have demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for an extended
diploma, a student must:
(a) While in grade nine through completion of high school, complete 12 credits, which may not
include more than six credits earned in a self-contained special education classroom and shall in-
[11]

SB 1572
clude:
(A) Two credits of mathematics;
(B) Two credits of language arts;
(C) Two credits of science;
(D) Three credits of history, geography, economics or civics;
(E) One credit of health;
(F) One credit of physical education; and
(G) One credit of the arts or a world language; and
(b) Have a documented history of:
(A) An inability to maintain grade level achievement due to significant learning and instruc-
tional barriers;
(B) A medical condition that creates a barrier to achievement; or
(C) A change in the student’s ability to participate in grade level activities as a result of a se-
rious illness or injury that occurred after grade eight.
(9) A school district or public charter school shall award a certificate of attendance to a student
who does not satisfy the requirements for a high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended
diploma if the student has maintained regular full-time attendance for at least four years beginning
in grade nine and meets requirements established by the board of the school district or public
charter school.
(10) A student shall have the opportunity to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section by the later of:
(a) Four years after starting grade nine; or
(b) The student reaching the age of 21 years, if the student is entitled to a public education until
the age of 21 years under state or federal law.
(11)(a) A student may satisfy the requirements described in subsection (7), (8) or (9) of this sec-
tion in less than four years if consent is provided in the manner described in subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
(b) The consent provided under this subsection must be written and must clearly state that the
parent, guardian or student is waiving the time allowed under subsection (10) of this section. A
consent may not be used to allow a student to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section in less than three years.
(c) A copy of all consents provided under this subsection for students in a school district must
be forwarded to the district superintendent.
(d) Each school district must provide to the Superintendent of Public Instruction information
about the number of consents provided during a school year.
(12)(a) A student who qualifies to receive or receives a modified diploma, an extended diploma
or a certificate of attendance shall:
(A) Have the option of participating in a high school graduation ceremony with the class of the
student; and
(B) Have access to instructional hours, hours of transition services and hours of other services
that are designed to:
(i) Meet the unique needs of the student; and
(ii) When added together, provide a total number of hours of instruction and services to the
student that equals at least the total number of instructional hours that is required to be provided
to students who are attending a public high school.
[12]

SB 1572
(b) A school district may not unilaterally decrease the total number of hours of instruction and
services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, regardless of the
age of the student.
(c) For purposes of paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, transition services and other services
designed to meet the unique needs of the student may be provided to the student through an inter-
agency agreement entered into by the school district if the individualized education program devel-
oped for the student indicates that the services may be provided by another agency. A school
district that enters into an interagency agreement as allowed under this paragraph retains the re-
sponsibility for ensuring that the student has access to the number of service hours required to be
provided to the student under this subsection. An agency is not required to change any eligibility
criteria or enrollment standards prior to entering into an interagency agreement as provided by this
paragraph.
(13) A school district or public charter school shall:
(a) Ensure that all students have on-site access to the appropriate resources and courses to
achieve high school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended diplomas at each high school in the
school district or at the public charter school.
(b) Provide literacy instruction to all students until graduation.
(c)(A) Provide to the parents or guardians of a student who has the documented history de-
scribed in subsection (8)(b) of this section:
(i) Information about the availability of high school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended
diplomas and the requirements for the diplomas; and
(ii) A disclosure that a student awarded a certificate of attendance will not be counted as a high
school graduate in any reporting for the state or school district and that a student awarded a cer-
tificate of attendance may not indicate that the student received a high school diploma on applica-
tions for employment, military service, financial aid, admittance to an institution of higher education
or any other purpose.
(B) The information and disclosure required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph must be
provided annually:
(i) Beginning in grade five; or
(ii) Beginning after a documented history described in subsection (8)(b) of this section has been
established.
(14) A school district or public charter school shall allow a student to participate in the high
school graduation ceremony with the class of the student and to wear:
(a) Native American items of cultural significance as provided by ORS 332.112; or
(b) A dress uniform issued to the student by a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States
if the student:
(A) Qualifies to receive a high school diploma, a modified diploma, an extended diploma or a
certificate of attendance under this section; and
(B) Has completed basic training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
SECTION 6. ORS 329.451, as amended by section 1, chapter 564, Oregon Laws 2023, and section
3, chapter 4, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
329.451. (1)(a) At or before grade 12, a school district or public charter school shall award a high
school diploma to a student who completes the requirements established by [subsection (2)] sub-
sections (2) and (3) of this section.
[13]

SB 1572
(b) A school district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma to a student who
satisfies the requirements established by [subsection (7)] subsections (3) and (7) of this section, an
extended diploma to a student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (8) of this
section or a certificate of attendance to a student who satisfies the requirements established by
subsection (9) of this section.
(c) A school district or public charter school may not deny a student who has the documented
history described in subsection (7)(b) or (8)(b) of this section the opportunity to pursue a diploma
with more stringent requirements than a modified diploma or an extended diploma.
(d) A school district or public charter school may award a modified diploma or extended diploma
to a student only upon receiving consent as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(2)(a) In order to receive a high school diploma from a school district or public charter school,
a student must satisfy the requirements established by the State Board of Education and the school
district or public charter school and, while in grades 9 through 12, must complete at least 24 total
credits, which must include at least:
(A) Three credits of mathematics;
(B) Four credits of language arts;
(C) One half-credit of civics;
(D) One half-credit of higher education and career path skills; and
(E) One half-credit of personal financial education.
(b) If a school district or public charter school requires a student to complete more than 24 total
credits, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school district or public charter school
may only require the student to complete additional credits for:
(A) Subjects for which the State Board of Education has established academic content standards
under ORS 329.045;
(B) Courses provided as part of a career and technical education program; or
(C) Courses that provide, or qualify to provide, credit at post-secondary institutions of education.
(c)(A) A school district or public charter school that requires students to satisfy any require-
ments not specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of Education
must grant to a student a waiver of the requirements established by the school district or public
charter school if the student is or, at any time from grade 9 to 12, was:
(i) A foster child, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(ii) Homeless, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iii) A runaway, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iv) A child in a military family covered by the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity
for Military Children, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(v) A child of a migrant worker, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Edu-
cation;
(vi) Enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education
Program; or
(vii) Enrolled in an approved recovery school under ORS 336.680.
(B)(i) For any student identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a school district or
public charter school must accept any credits earned by the student in an educational program in
this state and apply those credits toward requirements specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection
[14]

SB 1572
or by rule of the State Board of Education if the credits satisfied those requirements in that edu-
cational program in this state.
(ii) As used in this subparagraph, “educational program in this state” means an educational
program that is:
(I) Provided by a school district, a public charter school, an approved recovery school, the
Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(II) Funded as provided by ORS 343.243 for students in a long term care or treatment facility
described in ORS 343.961 or a hospital identified in ORS 343.261.
(d) The State Board of Education may adopt by rule requirements for courses, including teachers
of courses, related to higher education and career path skills and personal financial education that
allow the courses to satisfy multiple credit requirements for a high school diploma, including math-
ematics.
(e)(A) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules by which a student who has completed
an International Baccalaureate program may satisfy the credit requirements prescribed by para-
graph (a) of this subsection and any or all of the requirements established by rule of the State Board
of Education under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The rules:
(i) Must provide that the student has satisfied those requirements if the student has satisfied:
(I) All of the requirements for an International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme or an Inter-
national Baccalaureate Career-related Programme; and
(II) Any other requirements prescribed by the board by rule for a student who has completed
an International Baccalaureate program.
(ii) May provide that, only for the purpose of satisfying requirements as provided by this para-
graph, a person who is not an external International Baccalaureate examiner may grade assessments
or examinations for either program.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph prohibits a school district or public charter school from estab-
lishing requirements that are in addition to the credit requirements prescribed by paragraph (a) of
this subsection or any requirements established by rule under paragraph (a) of this subsection or
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) When establishing requirements under this paragraph, the board or a school district or
public charter school shall attempt not to establish requirements that may discourage access to or
participation in the International Baccalaureate program.
(3)(a) In addition to the credit requirements described in subsection (2) of this section
and any other requirements established by the State Board of Education or by a school dis-
trict or public charter school, the board shall adopt proficiency standards for Essential
Learning Skills that must be demonstrated before a student is awarded a high school diploma
or a modified diploma. The proficiency standards must be demonstrated for, at a minimum,
the following:
(A) Reading and comprehending a variety of text;
(B) Writing clearly and accurately; and
(C) Applying mathematics in a variety of settings.
(b) The board shall adopt by rule assessment options for students to demonstrate profi-
ciency in Essential Learning Skills, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[(3)] (c) A student providing work samples to demonstrate proficiency in Essential Learning
Skills [as may be required under subsection (2) of this section] must be allowed to use accommodations
described in the student’s individualized education program or the student’s plan developed in ac-
[15]

SB 1572
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794. As used in this
[subsection] paragraph, the term “accommodations”:
[(a)] (A) Includes, but is not limited to:
[(A)] (i) Additional time to demonstrate proficiency.
[(B)] (ii) The ability to demonstrate proficiency in an alternative location that is secure and
proctored.
[(C)] (iii) The use of text-to-speech or speech-to-text technology or other assistive technology.
[(b)] (B) Does not include modifications that lower the proficiency standards or that are used
solely to earn modified credit.
(4) A student may satisfy the requirements of [subsection (2)] subsections (2) and (3) of this
section in less than four years. If a student satisfies the requirements of [subsection (2)] subsections
(2) and (3) of this section and a school district or public charter school has received consent as
provided by subsection (6) of this section, the school district or public charter school shall award
a high school diploma to the student.
(5) If a school district or public charter school has received consent as provided by subsection
(6) of this section, the school district or public charter school may advance the student to the next
grade level if the student has satisfied the requirements for the student’s current grade level.
(6)(a) For the purpose of receiving consent as provided by subsections (1)(d), (4) and (5) of this
section, consent shall be provided by:
(A) The parent or guardian of the student, if the student:
(i) Is under 18 years of age and is not emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558; or
(ii) Has been determined not to have the ability to give informed consent regarding the student’s
education pursuant to a protective proceeding under ORS chapter 125; or
(B) The student, if the student is 18 years of age or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(b) For the purpose of awarding a modified diploma or extended diploma as provided by sub-
section (1)(d) of this section or of awarding a high school diploma as provided by subsection (4) of
this section, consent must be received during the school year for which the diploma will be awarded.
(7) A school district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma only to students
who have demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for a modified di-
ploma, a student must:
(a) Satisfy the requirements for a modified diploma established by this section and the State
Board of Education; and
(b) Have a documented history of an inability to maintain grade level achievement due to sig-
nificant learning and instructional barriers or have a documented history of a medical condition that
creates a barrier to achievement.
(8) A school district or public charter school shall award an extended diploma only to students
who have demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for an extended
diploma, a student must:
(a) While in grade nine through completion of high school, complete 12 credits, which may not
include more than six credits earned in a self-contained special education classroom and shall in-
clude:
(A) Two credits of mathematics;
[16]

SB 1572
(B) Two credits of language arts;
(C) Two credits of science;
(D) Three credits of history, geography, economics or civics;
(E) One credit of health;
(F) One credit of physical education; and
(G) One credit of the arts or a world language; and
(b) Have a documented history of:
(A) An inability to maintain grade level achievement due to significant learning and instruc-
tional barriers;
(B) A medical condition that creates a barrier to achievement; or
(C) A change in the student’s ability to participate in grade level activities as a result of a se-
rious illness or injury that occurred after grade eight.
(9) A school district or public charter school shall award a certificate of attendance to a student
who does not satisfy the requirements for a high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended
diploma if the student has maintained regular full-time attendance for at least four years beginning
in grade nine and meets requirements established by the board of the school district or public
charter school.
(10) A student shall have the opportunity to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section by the later of:
(a) Four years after starting grade nine; or
(b) The student reaching the age of 21 years, if the student is entitled to a public education until
the age of 21 years under state or federal law.
(11)(a) A student may satisfy the requirements described in subsection (7), (8) or (9) of this sec-
tion in less than four years if consent is provided in the manner described in subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
(b) The consent provided under this subsection must be written and must clearly state that the
parent, guardian or student is waiving the time allowed under subsection (10) of this section. A
consent may not be used to allow a student to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section in less than three years.
(c) A copy of all consents provided under this subsection for students in a school district must
be forwarded to the district superintendent.
(d) Each school district must provide to the Superintendent of Public Instruction information
about the number of consents provided during a school year.
(12)(a) A student who qualifies to receive or receives a modified diploma, an extended diploma
or a certificate of attendance shall:
(A) Have the option of participating in a high school graduation ceremony with the class of the
student; and
(B) Have access to instructional hours, hours of transition services and hours of other services
that are designed to:
(i) Meet the unique needs of the student; and
(ii) When added together, provide a total number of hours of instruction and services to the
student that equals at least the total number of instructional hours that is required to be provided
to students who are attending a public high school.
(b) A school district may not unilaterally decrease the total number of hours of instruction and
services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, regardless of the
[17]

SB 1572
age of the student.
(c) For purposes of paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, transition services and other services
designed to meet the unique needs of the student may be provided to the student through an inter-
agency agreement entered into by the school district if the individualized education program devel-
oped for the student indicates that the services may be provided by another agency. A school
district that enters into an interagency agreement as allowed under this paragraph retains the re-
sponsibility for ensuring that the student has access to the number of service hours required to be
provided to the student under this subsection. An agency is not required to change any eligibility
criteria or enrollment standards prior to entering into an interagency agreement as provided by this
paragraph.
(13) A school district or public charter school shall:
(a) Ensure that all students have on-site access to the appropriate resources and courses to
achieve high school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended diplomas at each high school in the
school district or at the public charter school.
(b) Provide literacy instruction to all students until graduation.
(c)(A) Provide to the parents or guardians of a student who has the documented history de-
scribed in subsection (8)(b) of this section:
(i) Information about the availability of high school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended
diplomas and the requirements for the diplomas; and
(ii) A disclosure that a student awarded a certificate of attendance will not be counted as a high
school graduate in any reporting for the state or school district and that a student awarded a cer-
tificate of attendance may not indicate that the student received a high school diploma on applica-
tions for employment, military service, financial aid, admittance to an institution of higher education
or any other purpose.
(B) The information and disclosure required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph must be
provided annually:
(i) Beginning in grade five; or
(ii) Beginning after a documented history described in subsection (8)(b) of this section has been
established.
(14) A school district or public charter school shall allow a student to participate in the high
school graduation ceremony with the class of the student and to wear:
(a) Native American items of cultural significance as provided by ORS 332.112; or
(b) A dress uniform issued to the student by a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States
if the student:
(A) Qualifies to receive a high school diploma, a modified diploma, an extended diploma or a
certificate of attendance under this section; and
(B) Has completed basic training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
SECTION 7. ORS 327.164 is amended to read:
327.164. As used in ORS 327.164 to 327.173:
(1) “Disaggregated” means separated based on student group.
(2) “Eighth-grade mathematics proficiency rate” means the percentage of students in the eighth
grade who are determined to be proficient or above in mathematics, as determined under rules
adopted by the State Board of Education.
(3) “Five-year completion rate” means the percentage of students who received a high school
[18]

SB 1572
diploma, a modified diploma or an extended diploma or who received a certificate for passing an
approved high school equivalency test such as the General Educational Development test (GED)
within five years of the student beginning the ninth grade.
(4) “High school diploma” means a diploma that is awarded to a student upon satisfaction of the
requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2) and (3).
(5) “Local metric rate” means the percentage of students who meet or exceed an indicator of a
measurable student performance outcome.
(6) “Ninth-grade on-track rate” means the percentage of students who, at the end of the summer
following the year the students began ninth grade, completed one quarter of the credits required for
high school graduation.
(7) “On-time graduation rate” means the percentage of students who received a high school di-
ploma or a modified diploma within four years of the students beginning the ninth grade.
(8) “Regular attendance rate” means the percentage of students who are absent, as determined
by Department of Education policy, for less than 10 percent of the school days for which the stu-
dents are enrolled.
(9) “Regular early-grade attendance rate” means the percentage of students in kindergarten
through grade two who are absent, as determined by Department of Education policy, for less than
10 percent of the school days for which the students are enrolled.
(10) “School district” means:
(a) A common school district or a union high school district;
(b) An education service district that has enrolled students in any grade from kindergarten
through grade 12 for specialized services;
(c) A public charter school;
(d) An approved recovery school;
(e) The Youth Corrections Education Program;
(f) The Juvenile Detention Education Program;
(g) The Oregon School for the Deaf; or
(h) Eligible day treatment programs and eligible residential treatment programs for education
services to children who are in treatment programs as described in ORS 343.961.
(11) “Student group” means the following student groups:
(a) Economically disadvantaged students, as determined based on rules adopted by the State
Board of Education;
(b) Students from racial or ethnic groups that have historically experienced academic disparities,
as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(c) Students with disabilities;
(d) Students who are English language learners;
(e) Students who are foster children, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(f) Students who are homeless, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Edu-
cation; and
(g) Any other student groups that have historically experienced academic disparities, as deter-
mined by the State Board of Education by rule.
(12) “Third-grade reading proficiency rate” means the percentage of students in the third grade
who are determined to be proficient or above in English language arts, as determined under rules
adopted by the State Board of Education.
SECTION 8. ORS 336.585 is amended to read:
[19]

SB 1572
336.585. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Juvenile Detention Education Program” means the program defined in ORS 326.695.
(b) “Resident district” means the school district in which the parents or legal guardian, if any,
of a child resided at the time of the child’s enrollment in the Juvenile Detention Education Program.
If the child has no parents or legal guardian, or none can be located, the resident district is the
school district in which the child is physically located.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall provide or cause to be provided appropriate education
for children enrolled in an educational program under the Juvenile Detention Education Program.
The Superintendent of Public Instruction may contract with a school district or education service
district to provide or cause to be provided appropriate education to children enrolled in an educa-
tional program under the Juvenile Detention Education Program. For the purpose of this section,
an appropriate education includes transition services from the Juvenile Detention Education Pro-
gram into school settings and workforce preparation programs and any necessary ongoing support
for a transition.
(b) An education service district that provides education as provided by this subsection and that
awards high school diplomas:
(A) May not impose requirements for a high school diploma that are in addition to the require-
ments prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)(a) [or] and (3) and by rule of the State Board of Education;
and
(B) Must accept any credits previously earned by children in another school or educational
program in this state and apply those credits toward the requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451
(2)(a) [or] and (3) and by rule of the State Board of Education.
(3) The superintendent shall pay the costs of providing education to children enrolled in an ed-
ucational program under the Juvenile Detention Education Program from the State School Fund
grant allocated for that purpose under ORS 327.026.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt by rule standards to be applied to the operation
of the Juvenile Detention Education Program, including standards that allow a school district or an
education service district under contract with the superintendent to:
(a) Implement an assessment system as provided by ORS 329.485.
(b) Administer a nationally normed assessment as provided by ORS 329.488.
(c) Participate in the beginning teacher and administrator mentorship program established by
ORS 329.788 to 329.820.
(d) Receive funds under ORS chapter 329.
(5) The superintendent shall ensure that the resident district of each child enrolled in an edu-
cational program under the Juvenile Detention Education Program is notified, if the resident district
can be reasonably identified. The purposes of the notification include, but are not limited to:
(a) Removing the child from the resident district’s census;
(b) Facilitating transfers of the child’s educational records; and
(c) Facilitating planning for the child’s possible return to the resident district.
SECTION 9. ORS 336.590 is amended to read:
336.590. (1) As used in this section, “Youth Corrections Education Program” means the program
defined in ORS 326.695.
(2) The Department of Education shall provide or cause to be provided appropriate education
for children enrolled in an educational program under the Youth Corrections Education
Program. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may contract with a school district or education
[20]

SB 1572
service district to provide or cause to be provided appropriate education to children enrolled in an
educational program under the Youth Corrections Education Program. For the purpose of this sec-
tion, an appropriate education includes transition services from the Youth Corrections Education
Program into school settings and workforce preparation programs and any necessary ongoing sup-
port for a transition.
(3) The superintendent shall pay the costs of providing education to children enrolled in an ed-
ucational program under the Youth Corrections Education Program from the State School Fund
grant allocated for that purpose under ORS 327.026.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt by rule standards to be applied to the operation
of the Youth Corrections Education Program, including standards that allow a school district or an
education service district under contract with the superintendent to:
(a) Award high school diplomas, modified diplomas, extended diplomas and certificates of at-
tendance as provided by ORS 329.451 and 339.877. An education service district that awards high
school diplomas as provided by this paragraph:
(A) May not impose requirements for a high school diploma that are in addition to the require-
ments prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)(a) [or] and (3) and by rule of the State Board of Education;
and
(B) Must accept any credits previously earned by children in another school or educational
program in this state and apply those credits toward the requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451
(2)(a) [or] and (3) and by rule of the State Board of Education.
(b) Implement an assessment system as provided by ORS 329.485.
(c) Administer a nationally normed assessment as provided by ORS 329.488.
(d) Participate in the beginning teacher and administrator mentorship program established by
ORS 329.788 to 329.820.
(e) Receive funds under ORS chapter 329.
SECTION 10. ORS 336.680 is amended to read:
336.680. (1) As used in this section, “approved recovery school” means a school that is under
an agreement with the Department of Education to provide students enrolled in the school with a
holistic approach to:
(a) Educational services for grades 9 through 12; and
(b) Health care services related to recovery from substance use disorders.
(2) The department shall provide or cause to be provided appropriate education for students
enrolled in an approved recovery school. For the purpose of paying the costs of providing education
to students enrolled in an approved recovery school, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
make the following:
(a) Payments from amounts available from the State School Fund under ORS 327.029.
(b) Payments from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account, as provided by rule adopted by
the State Board of Education in collaboration with the advisory committee convened under ORS
336.685. The rules adopted as provided by this paragraph may include a minimum amount, a maxi-
mum amount or both for approved recovery schools.
(3) The Superintendent of Public Instruction may contract with a school district, an education
service district or a public charter school to provide or cause to be provided appropriate education
to students enrolled in an approved recovery school. Unless otherwise specified, any educational
services provided under a contract entered into under this subsection shall be paid as described in
this section and not by any other state moneys distributed based on average daily membership that
[21]

SB 1572
are available to the school district, education service district or public charter school for the pur-
pose of providing educational services.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt by rule the standards for a recovery school to
become and operate as an approved recovery school. The standards must provide that:
(a) The recovery school must align, to the extent identified by the board, with standards for
accreditation established by a nonprofit accrediting organization composed of representatives of re-
covery schools and individuals who support the growth of recovery schools. The standards must in-
clude requirements that:
(A) The recovery school, in compliance with timelines established by the department, be ac-
credited by a nonprofit accrediting organization that establishes standards for recovery schools.
Nothing in this subparagraph requires the recovery school to be accredited at the time the super-
intendent first enters into a contract with the recovery school.
(B) Student enrollment in the recovery school is voluntary. No school district or state or local
agency may compel or otherwise require a student to enroll in a recovery school. Students enrolled
in an approved recovery school may not be counted in determining the number of pupils in average
daily membership for purposes of ORS 334.175 (5).
(C) All students who reside in this state and who meet the eligibility criteria established under
subsection (8) of this section may enroll in an approved recovery school if space is available. If
space is not available, the approved recovery school may prioritize for enrollment student groups
identified in ORS 327.164 (11).
(D) The school district, education service district or public charter school with which the de-
partment has entered into a contract for a recovery school must agree to award high school diplo-
mas, modified diplomas, extended diplomas and alternative certificates as provided by ORS 329.451
and 339.877. An entity that awards high school diplomas as provided by this subparagraph:
(i) May not impose requirements for a high school diploma that are in addition to the require-
ments prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)(a) [or] and (3) and by rule of the State Board of Education;
and
(ii) Must accept any credits previously earned by students in another school or educational
program in this state and apply those credits toward the requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451
(2)(a) [or] and (3) and by rule of the State Board of Education.
(E) Except as provided by subparagraphs (F) and (G) of this paragraph, the recovery school must
satisfy the same laws that apply to public charter schools under ORS 338.115.
(F) All administrators and teachers at the recovery school must be licensed by the Teacher
Standards and Practices Commission.
(G) An approved recovery school is not required to comply with the enrollment requirements
prescribed by ORS 338.115 (1)(bb) or (5).
(H) An approved recovery school must comply with the requirements of the uniform budget and
accounting system adopted by rule of the State Board of Education under ORS 327.511.
(b) Recovery schools will be approved, to the greatest extent practicable, in a manner that:
(A) Represents a geographic distribution across this state; and
(B) Takes into consideration the needs for services by the community in which the recovery
school would be located.
(5) Any school that provides the services of a recovery school may enter into a contract with
the superintendent to become an approved recovery school, including schools already providing the
services of a recovery school and schools that are proposing to provide the services of a recovery
[22]

SB 1572
school.
(6) An approved recovery school may enter into agreements with other entities, including
community-based organizations and federally recognized tribes of this state, for the purposes of
providing educational and health care services to students enrolled in the approved recovery school.
(7)(a) The department shall be responsible for:
(A) Identifying, locating and evaluating students enrolled in an approved recovery school who
may be in need of special education and related services; and
(B) Ensuring that eligible students receive special education and related services.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection, the department may enter into a contract with a school
district or an education service district.
(8) The department shall establish eligibility criteria for students to enroll in an approved re-
covery school, based on input from the advisory committee convened under ORS 336.685 and based
on research from a nonprofit organization composed of representatives of recovery schools and in-
dividuals who support the growth of recovery schools and other relevant organizations.
(9) For the purposes of administering this section:
(a) The State Board of Education shall adopt any necessary rules.
(b) The department shall collaborate with the Oregon Health Authority, the Youth Development
Division, the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission, the Oregon Youth Authority, the Department
of Human Services and local public health and mental health authorities or providers and shall co-
ordinate, to the greatest extent practicable, funding of services provided in relation to approved
recovery schools.
(10) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall prepare a report on the progress, suc-
cesses and challenges of approved recovery schools and submit that report to:
(a) The interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education; and
(b) The advisory committee convened under ORS 336.685.
SECTION 11. ORS 343.331 is amended to read:
343.331. ORS 343.322, 343.324, 343.326 and 343.328 do not apply to any of the following:
(1) Any abbreviated school days that are a component of discipline imposed in compliance with
ORS 339.250, 339.252 or 343.155 (5) or that are the result of a placement made as provided by ORS
343.177.
(2) A student’s exclusion from schools due to the student’s immunization status or due to the
student’s exposure to a restrictable disease, as provided by ORS 433.235 to 433.284.
(3) The exclusion of a student from schools or the closure or restriction of access to schools due
to actions taken under a public health emergency authorized under ORS 433.441 to 433.452.
(4) A student who has fulfilled all state requirements for graduation with a high school diploma,
as described in ORS 329.451 (2) and (3), when the parent or foster parent has agreed to the abbre-
viated school day program.
(5) A student enrolled in a program described in ORS 336.585, 336.590, 339.129, 343.261, 343.961
(1)(c)(A)(i) or 346.010, if the student has meaningful access to the same number of hours of instruc-
tion and educational services as the majority of other students enrolled in the same program as the
student.
(6) A student whose parent or foster parent has notified an education service district that the
student is being taught by a parent, legal guardian or private teacher under ORS 339.035.
(7) A student who is excluded from, or limited access to, school due to a court order.
(8) A student who is voluntarily enrolled in a public charter school in compliance with ORS
[23]

SB 1572
chapter 338 when:
(a) The majority of the students enrolled in the public charter school are not students with
disabilities;
(b) The public charter school is not designed for the purpose of serving students with challeng-
ing behaviors or complex medical needs;
(c) The public charter school has a longer school year than the school year for the school dis-
trict in which the public charter school is located;
(d) As calculated for the school year, the regular schedule of the public charter school provides
at least 95 percent of the total number of hours provided to the majority of other students who are
in the same grade within the student’s resident school district; and
(e) The student is not restricted to attending fewer hours of instruction and educational services
than the number of hours of instruction and educational services attended by the majority of stu-
dents without disabilities who are in the same grade and who attend the same public charter school.
(9) A high school student who is voluntarily enrolled in an alternative education program in
compliance with ORS 336.635, the Expanded Options Program under ORS 340.005 to 340.090 or an
accelerated college credit program as defined in ORS 340.300, when:
(a) The majority of the students of the program are not students with disabilities;
(b) The student is not restricted to attending fewer hours of instruction and educational services
than the number of hours of instruction and educational services attended by the majority of stu-
dents without disabilities who are in the same grade and who attend the same program; and
(c) For an alternative education program in which the student is enrolled under ORS 336.635,
the school district informs the parent or foster parent, in writing and in a language and format ac-
cessible to the parent or foster parent, that upon written request of the parent or foster parent, the
student will be immediately restored to a school that allows the student to access the same number
of hours of instruction and educational services that are provided to the majority of other students
who are in the same grade within the student’s resident school district.
(10) A student who, when registering for classes for a term or semester of a school year, vol-
untarily does not schedule a class for one or more class periods. The provisions of this subsection
apply only if the student is:
(a) In grade 11 or 12 and is on track to fulfill all state requirements for graduation with a high
school diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (2) and (3), or a modified diploma, as described in ORS
329.451 (3) and (7), within four years of starting grade 9; or
(b) On track to fulfill all state requirements for graduation with a high school diploma, as de-
scribed in ORS 329.451 (2) and (3), or a modified diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (3) and (7),
by the end of the school year in which the student voluntarily does not schedule a class for one or
more class periods.
(11) Asynchronous instruction if the instruction:
(a) Is for only one class per term or semester;
(b) Satisfies a credit requirement for a high school diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (2) and
(3), or a modified diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (3) and (7);
(c) Is a credit recovery class or is a class not otherwise available to the student;
(d) Is offered to students on a voluntary basis and is not restricted to only students with a dis-
ability; and
(e) Is accessible to a student while the student is at school and while staff of the school are
immediately available to the student.
[24]

SB 1572
SECTION 12. (1) The amendments to ORS 327.164, 329.007, 329.451, 336.585, 336.590, 336.680
and 343.331 by sections 3 to 11 of this 2026 Act become operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The amendments to ORS 327.164, 329.007, 329.451, 336.585, 336.590, 336.680 and 343.331
by sections 3 to 11 of this 2026 Act apply to diplomas awarded on or after January 1, 2027.
(3) Notwithstanding the operative date set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the
State Board of Education, the Department of Education and any entity that awards high
school diplomas and modified diplomas may take any action before the operative date set
forth in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the board, department or entity
to exercise, on and after the operative date set forth in subsection (1) of this section, all of
the duties, functions and powers necessary to award diplomas as provided by ORS 329.451.

READING STANDARDS

SECTION 13. ORS 329.045, as amended by section 1, chapter 202, Oregon Laws 2019, section
6, chapter 178, Oregon Laws 2021, section 1, chapter 328, Oregon Laws 2023, section 7, chapter 564,
Oregon Laws 2023, and section 2, chapter 445, Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
329.045. (1)(a) In order to achieve the goals contained in ORS 329.025, the State Board of Edu-
cation shall regularly and periodically review and revise its Common Curriculum Goals, performance
indicators and diploma requirements.
(b) The review and revision conducted under this section shall:
(A) Include Essential Learning Skills and rigorous academic content standards in mathematics,
science, language arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education and career path
skills, personal financial education, physical education, health, the arts and world languages.
(B) Ensure that the academic content standards for language arts use teaching strate-
gies derived from the science of reading and writing, as defined in ORS 327.825.
[(B)] (C) Ensure that the academic content standards for history, geography, economics and
civics include sufficient instruction on the histories, contributions and perspectives of individuals
who:
(i) Are Native American;
(ii) Are of African, Asian, Pacific Island, Chicano, Latino, Middle Eastern or Jewish descent;
(iii) Are women;
(iv) Have disabilities;
(v) Are immigrants or refugees; or
(vi) Are lesbian, gay, bisexual or transgender.
[(C)] (D) Ensure that any revisions to the academic content standards for science, health, his-
tory, geography, economics and civics include standards that address the causes and effects of cli-
mate change and strategies for mitigating, adapting to and strengthening community resilience to
those causes and effects.
[(D)] (E) Involve teachers and other educators, parents of students and other citizens and shall
provide ample opportunity for public comment.
[(E)] (F) Encourage increased learning time. As used in this subparagraph, “increased learning
time” means a schedule that encompasses a longer school day, week or year for the purpose of in-
creasing the total number of school hours available to provide:
(i) Students with instruction in core academic subjects, including mathematics, science, language
arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education and career path skills, personal finan-
[25]

SB 1572
cial education, the arts and world languages;
(ii) Students with instruction in subjects other than the subjects identified in sub-subparagraph
(i) of this subparagraph, including health and physical education;
(iii) Students with the opportunity to participate in enrichment activities that contribute to a
well-rounded education, including learning opportunities that may be based on service, experience
or work and that may be provided through partnerships with other organizations; and
(iv) Teachers with the opportunity to collaborate, plan and engage in professional development
within and across grades and subjects.
(c) Nothing in this subsection prevents a school district or public charter school from main-
taining control over course content, format, materials and teaching methods.
(2) The State Board of Education shall continually review and revise all adopted academic con-
tent standards necessary for students to successfully transition to the next phase of their education.
(3)(a) School districts and public charter schools must offer students instruction in mathematics,
science, language arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education and career path
skills, personal financial education, physical education, health, the arts and world languages.
(b) Instruction required under paragraph (a) of this subsection must:
(A) Meet the academic content standards adopted by the State Board of Education; and
(B) Meet the requirements adopted by the State Board of Education and the board of the school
district or public charter school.
SECTION 14. (1) The amendments to ORS 329.045 by section 13 of this 2026 Act become
operative on July 1, 2029.
(2) The academic content standards prescribed by ORS 329.045 (1)(b)(B), as amended by
section 13 of this 2026 Act, first apply to the 2029-2030 school year.
(3) Notwithstanding the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, the
State Board of Education shall adopt academic content standards as provided by ORS 329.045
(1)(b)(B), as amended by section 13 of this 2026 Act, in a manner to ensure that school dis-
tricts can implement the standards beginning with the 2029-2030 school year.
SECTION 15. Section 16 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 329.
SECTION 16. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Early elementary grade” means any grade from prekindergarten through grade
three.
(b) “High-dosage tutoring” has the meaning given that term in ORS 327.825.
(c) “Third-grade reading proficiency” means proficiency in reading, as determined under
rules of the State Board of Education, by the end of the third grade.
(2) Each school district board shall adopt policies to achieve third-grade reading profi-
ciency. The policies must provide that:
(a) When a student in any early elementary grade is found to be below grade level in
reading, the school district shall ensure that:
(A) The student is provided immediate and intensive reading instruction, which may in-
clude high-dosage tutoring; and
(B) The parent or guardian of the student is immediately notified that the student is
below grade level in reading and is provided with information about the intensive reading
instruction being provided to the student.
(b) A student who has not achieved third-grade reading proficiency is not allowed to ad-
vance to the next grade level as provided by subsection (3) of this section.
[26]

SB 1572
(c) A student who is not allowed to advance to the next grade level as provided by sub-
section (3) of this section is provided high-dosage tutoring in language arts during regular
instructional hours until the student achieves third-grade reading proficiency.
(3)(a) Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, a school district may not
advance a student to the next grade level when the student is found to have not achieved
third-grade reading proficiency, as determined by the school district under rules adopted by
the State Board of Education.
(b) A school district may advance a student to the next grade level even if the student
has not achieved third-grade reading proficiency only for good cause, as determined by the
school district based on rules adopted by the State Board of Education. Good cause may not
include consideration of the student’s age.
(c) A student who is found to have not achieved third-grade reading proficiency may ad-
vance to the next grade level if, at any time, the student demonstrates that the student has
achieved third-grade reading proficiency. For the purpose of this paragraph, a school district
shall provide the opportunity to demonstrate third-grade reading proficiency:
(A) At least once after a finding has been made that the student has not achieved
third-grade reading proficiency but before the end of the school year in which the student
is in the third grade; and
(B) At least once before the beginning of the school year after which the finding was
made that the student has not achieved third-grade proficiency.
(4) When adopting rules under this section, the State Board of Education shall ensure
to the greatest extent practicable alignment with the requirements and goals of the Early
Literacy Success Initiative established by ORS 327.825 to 327.845.
SECTION 17. Section 16 of this 2026 Act first applies to the 2026-2027 school year.

MISCELLANEOUS

SECTION 18. The unit captions used in this 2026 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 19. This 2026 Act takes effect on July 1, 2026.

[27]